Nevada, session 83, AB92.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a room or space is available in a building that is open to
the general public and occupied by the government of this State or
a political subdivision of this State or an agency thereof, except a
building that is owned or occupied by any component of the
Nevada System of Higher Education, the public officer or
employee in control of the room or space shall, upon application
by a state or county central committee of a major political party,
grant the use of the room or space to the state or county central
committee:
(a) During a presidential election year, without charge for any
purpose; and
(b) During any year that is not a presidential election year:
(1) Without charge for the purpose of conducting a precinct
meeting; and
(2) At a rate that must not exceed the rate charged to any
other group during this time period for the use of the room or
space, for any purpose other than conducting a precinct meeting.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. As used in this section, “precinct meeting” means a
meeting of the state or central committee of a major political party
held to elect delegates and alternates for a state or county
convention of a major political party.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)